tests/kün.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-lookup
      Gen: ../krc.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../krc.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "[twol] кюн":


  кюн<n><attr> : кюн
  кюн<n><nom> : кюн
  кюн<n><acc> : кюнню
  кюн<n><gen> : кюнню
  кюн<n><dat> : кюннге
  кюн<n><loc> : кюнде
  кюн<n><abl> : кюнден
  кюн<n><nom>+э<cop><aor><p3><sg> : кюндю
  кюн<n><pl><abl> : кюнледен
  кюн<n><pl><acc> : кюнлени
  кюн<n><pl><dat> : кюнлеге
  кюн<n><pl><gen> : кюнлени
  кюн<n><pl><loc> : кюнледе
  кюн<n><pl><nom> : кюнле
  кюн<n><pl><nom>+э<cop><aor><p3><pl> : кюнледиле
  кюн<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : кюнлери
  кюн<n><pl><px3sp><dat> : кюнлерине
  кюн<n><pl><px3sp><acc> : кюнлерини
  кюн<n><pl><px3sp><gen> : кюнлерини
  кюн<n><px1pl><nom> : кюнюбюз
  кюн<n><px2sg><dat> : кюннге
  кюн<n><px2sg><nom> : кюнюнг
  кюн<n><px3sp><acc> : кюнюн
  кюн<n><px3sp><dat> : кюнюне
  кюн<n><px3sp><gen> : кюнюн
  кюн<n><px3sp><gen> : кюнюню
  кюн<n><px3sp><loc> : кюнде
  кюн<n><px3sp><loc> : кюнюнде
  кюн<n><px3sp><nom> : кюню
  кюн<n><px3sp><nom>+э<cop><aor><p1><pl> : кюнюбюз
  кюн<n><px3sp><nom>+э<cop><aor><p3><sg> : кюндю
  кюн<n><px3sp><nom>+э<cop><aor><p3><sg> : кюнюдю
